Washington statutes.
RCW 7.84.010

Legislative declaration.

The legislature declares that decriminalizing certain offenses contained in Titles *75, 76, 77, 79, and 79A RCW and chapter 43.30 RCW and any rules adopted pursuant to those titles and chapters would promote the more efficient administration of those titles and chapters. The purpose of this chapter is to provide a just, uniform, and efficient procedure for adjudicating those violations which, in any of these titles and chapters or rules adopted under these chapters or titles, are declared not to be criminal offenses. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to prescribe any rules of procedure necessary to implement this chapter.

[ 1999 c 249 s 502; 1993 c 244 s 2; 1987 c 380 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, or decodified in its entirety by 2000 c 107. See Comparative Table for Title 75 RCW, in the Table of Disposition of Former RCW Sections.

Severability—1999 c 249: See note following RCW 79A.05.010.

Intent—1993 c 244: See note following RCW 79A.60.010.